District of Columbia statutes.
44-419

Annual report.

The SHPDA shall prepare and publish annually a report on the status of health systems development in the District, including the health plan development and implementation program, the health data and information program, and the certificate of need program. The report shall include a listing of the certificate of need reviews completed by SHPDA since the last report, a general statement of the finding and decisions made in the course of reviews, and the status of pending reviews.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-191, § 20, 43 DCR 4535
1981 Ed., § 32-369.